src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
ablatum/S
abolitum/S
abrasum/S
abscessum/S
abscissum/S
abscisum/S
absolutum/S
abstentum/S
abstractum/S
absumptum/S
accensum/S
acceptum/S
accessum/S
accisum/S
accretum/S
acquisitum/S
actum/S
acutum/S
adactum/S
adauctum/S
additum/S
adductum/S
ademptus/S
adhibitum/S
adiectum/S
adinventum/S
aditum/S
adiunctum/S
adiutum/S
adlatum/S
admiratus/S
admissum/S
admixtum/S
admonitum/S
admotum/S
adnexum/S
adpensum/S
adpictum/S
adquisitum/S
adscriptum/S
adsecutus/S
adstructum/S
adtactum/S
adtractum/S
adtributum/S
adventum/S
adversatus/S
adversum/S
aemulatus/S
affectum/S
aggressus/S
agnitum/S
allatum/S
allectum/S
altum/S
ambitum/S
amissum/S
amotum/S
animadversum/S
annexum/S
annixus/S
antecessum/S
antepositum/S
apertum/S
apparitum/S
appensum/S
appetitum/S
applausum/S
appositum/S
apprehensum/S
arefactus/S
argumentus/S
argutum/S
arreptum/S
arrisum/S
arsurus/S
ascensum/S
ascriptum/S
aspersum/S
assecutus/S
assensus/S
assentum/S
assertum/S
assuetum/S
assumptum/S
astructum/S
attactum/S
attentum/S
attractum/S
attributum/S
attritum/S
auctum/S
auditum/S
ausus/S
aversum/S
beatum/S
calefactum/S
capiturus/S
careiturus/S
casum/S
censum/S
circulatus/S
circumdatum/S
circumflexum/S
circumlatum/S
circumscriptum/S
circumventum/S
circundatum/S
clausum/S
coalitum/S
coassumptum/S
coercitum/S
cohaesum/S
coitum/S
collatum/S
collisum/S
comitatus/S
comminutum/S
commixtum/S
commotum/S
compertum/S
completum/S
comprehensum/S
compulsum/S
concalefactum/S
concessum/S
conclusum/S
concursum/S
conditum/S
conexum/S
confictum/S
confixum/S
confusum/S
coniectum/S
connexum/S
conquietum/S
consecutus/S
conspectum/S
constitutum/S
consuetum/S
consumptum/S
consutum/S
contemplatus/S
contentum/S
contextum/S
contradictum/S
contrapendentum/S
conventum/S
convestitum/S
convolutum/S
correctum/S
corruptum/S
creatum/S
cretum/S
cupitum/S
cusum/S
debitum/S
decerptum/S
decretum/S
deductum/S
definitum/S
deiectum/S
delatum/S
deliniatum/S
demersum/S
demissum/S
demptum/S
depensum/S
deprehensum/S
depressum/S
desaevitum/S
descriptum/S
desertum/S
destitum/S
destructum/S
detectum/S
detractum/S
deventum/S
dictum/S
diffusum/S
dignotum/S
dilectum/S
dimissum/S
directum/S
discessum/S
discitum/S
discursum/S
disertum/S
disiunctum/S
dispectum/S
dispulsum/S
dissessum/S
distractum/S
diversum/S
doctum/S
dominatus/S
editum/S
effectum/S
effusum/S
elapsus/S
electum/S
elisum/S
elusum/S
emersum/S
emunctum/S
erectum/S
eruptum/S
evasum/S
eversum/S
exactum/S
excerptum/S
excisum/S
excretum/S
excusum/S
exemptum/S
exhaustum/S
exitum/S
exortus/S
expensum/S
expetitum/S
expletum/S
exposcitum/S
expressum/S
expunctum/S
exquisitum/S
extensum/S
extructum/S
exurectum/S
factum/S
famulatus/S
fictum/S
fissum/S
fletum/S
fotum/S
fugiturus/S
functus/S
genitum/S
gloriatus/S
habitum/S
iaciturus/S
iaculatus/S
ignitum/S
illapsus/S
illisum/S
imbibi/S
immersum/S
immoratus/S
impeditum/S
impertitum/S
impositum/S
impulsum/S
inceptum/S
incisum/S
incubitum/S
incussus/S
indignatus/S
inductum/S
inebriatum/S
inflexum/S
infusum/S
ingestum/S
iniectum/S
innixus/S
inquisitum/S
insculpum/S
inservitum/S
inspectum/S
institutum/S
intectum/S
intentum/S
intercessum/S
interclusum/S
interiectum/S
intermissum/S
internotum/S
interpretatus/S
intersectum/S
interventum/S
introductum/S
invasum/S
inversum/S
irradiatus/S
itum/S
iussum/S
lacessitum/S
largitus/S
latum/S
locutus/S
mansum/S
mensus/S
meritum/S
metitus/S
minutum/S
missum/S
moderatus/Sabcrs
molitus/S
moratus/S
munitum/S
nactus/S
neglectum/S
nescitum/S
nixus/S
notum/S
obiectum/S
oblatum/S
obrutum/S
obstaturus/S
obtusum/S
occisum/S
occultum/S
odoratus/S
offusum/S
opinatus/S
orsus/S
ostentum/S
parsum/S
partum/S
passus/S
peractum/S
percursum/S
perditum/S
peremptum/S
perfluxum/S
periclitatus/S
permansum/S
permissum/S
perpolitum/S
perscrutatus/S
perspectum/S
persuasum/S
pertransitum/S
perversum/S
pistum/S
politum/S
porrectum/S
possessum/S
postpositum/S
praeceptum/S
praedictum/S
praefectum/S
praemissum/S
praereptum/S
praestatum/S
praeteritum/S
praetermissum/S
prehensum/S
processum/S
procursum/S
proditum/S
profectum/S
profluctum/S
progenitum/S
proiectum/S
promeritum/S
promissum/S
promptum/S
propulsum/S
prosecutus/S
protentum/S
provectum/S
provisum/S
pulsum/S
questus/S
raptum/S
ratiocinatus/S
recensitum/S
recessum/S
recognitum/S
recordatus/S
recultum/S
redactum/S
reditum/S
reflexum/S
refusum/S
reiectum/S
relictum/S
remissum/S
remotum/S
repertum/S
repletum/S
reprehensum/S
repulsum/S
resartum/S
resectum/S
resolutum/S
responsum/S
restrictum/S
retusum/S
revisum/S
rimatus/S
ruptum/S
sapii/S
scansum/S
scissum/S
scriptum/S
secessum/S
secretum/S
secutus/S
selectum/S
servitum/S
situm/S
solutum/S
sortitus/S
speculatus/S
stabilitum/S
staturus/S
stratum/S
structum/S
subiectum/S
subiunctum/S
subscriptum/S
subsecutus/S
substitutum/S
subtentum/S
subtractum/S
successum/S
suetum/S
suffuratum/S
superadditum/S
supertextum/S
suppetitum/S
suppositum/S
susceptum/S
suspensum/S
sustentum/S
tactum/S
tectum/S
tersum/S
tortum/S
traditum/S
traiectum/S
transcriptum/S
translatum/S
transparitum/S
transvectum/S
tributum/S
tuitus/S
ultus/S
vagatus/S
variatum/S
ventum/S
vestitum/S
victum/S
volutum/S
